Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-1114
Personal data; sale; process for advertising; disclosure; consumer action.

If a controller sells personal data to any third party or processes personal data for targeted advertising, the controller shall clearly and conspicuously disclose that process and the manner in which a consumer may exercise the right to opt out of that process.

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 14.
January 1, 2025